Illinois, session 104th, HB3189.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Secretary of State Act is amended by adding 5Section 21 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 305/21 new)7    Sec. 21. Office of Faith-Based Community Development 8Services.9    (a) The Secretary of State shall create an Office of 10Faith-Based Community Development Services to connect 11faith-based community organizations with grant opportunities, 12as well as provide assistance in completing grant 13applications. The Office of Faith-Based Community Development 14Services shall also promote collaboration and unity among 15diverse groups, foster interfaith dialogue and interagency 16collaboration to offer comprehensive support services, ensure 17equitable distribution of resources across various community 18groups to support their missions and projects, leverage 19faith-based properties to increase housing opportunities, and 20develop guides on mental health, grant application processes, 21housing initiatives, and creating sensory-friendly spaces for 22the faith community.23    (b) The Secretary of State shall appoint an Interfaith   HB3189- 2 -LRB104 09449 SPS 19509 b1Advisory Council to advise the Office of Faith-Based Community 2Development Services and collaborate with religious 3communities in this State.